lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/anc_xal/rules.xfst
read lexc lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon;
define Cleanup0 "+" -> 0;
define Cleanup1 "}"-> 0;
define Cleanup2 "{"-> 0;
define Cleanup3 "^"-> 0;
define Cleanup4 "@"-> 0;
define Cleanup5 "$"-> 0;
define Cleanup6 "<"-> 0;
define Cleanup7 ">"-> 0;



define SoftVowels  [ ü | e | ö ];

define HardVowels  [ u | a | o ];

define NarSoftVowels [ e ];
define LabSoftVowels [ ü | ö ];
define LabHardVowels [ u | o ];
define Vowels [ SoftVowels | HardVowels | LongHardVowels | LongSoftVowels | NarSoftVowels ];

define LongLabHardVowels [ ō | ū ];

define LongWideHardVowels [ ā ];
define LongHardVowels [ LongHardVowels | LongLabHardVowels ];

define LongLabSoftVowels [ ǖ | ȫ ]; 
define LongNarSoftVowels [ ē ];
define LongSoftVowels [ LongLabSoftVowels | LongNarSoftVowels ];
define LongVowels [LongHardVowels | LongSoftVowels ];
define DiphthongI [ e y i | i y i | e i | ü y i | ü i | ö y i | ö i | u y i | u i | o y i | o i | a y i | a i ];
define DiphthongNarSoft [ e y i | i y i | e i ];
define DiphthongLabSoft [ DiphthongOSoft | DiphthongUSoft ];
define DiphthongUSoft [ ö ü | ü ü | ö ǖ | u ǖ | ǖ ü | ü y i | ü i ];
define DiphthongOSoft [ ö ü | ȫ | ö y i | ö i ];
define DiphthongSoft [ DiphthongLabSoft | DiphthongNarSoft ];
define DiphthongLabHard [ DiphthongU | DiphthongO ];
define DiphthongU [ u u | u ū | u y i | u i | o u ];
define DiphthongO [ o o | o y i | o i ];
define DiphthongWideHard [ a y i | a i ];
define DiphthongHard [ DiphthongLabHard | DiphthongWideHard ];
define Diphthong [ DiphthongSoft | DiphthongHard ];
define Cons [ b | g | q | γ | d | ǰ | z | y | k | ҟ | l | m | n | n g | p | r | s | t | x | c | č | š ];

define ConsSDB [ s | d | b ];

define AlvCons [ l | n | d | t ];

define LabCons [ m | b ];

define PlovCons [ b | d | g | q ];

define TrillCons [ r ];

define AlvPlCons [ d | t ];

define FricCons [ s | š ];

define NazCons [ m | n | n g ];

define LatCons [ l ];

define NGCon [ n g ];

define PluralCons [ k | ҟ | g | q ];
